Utah statutes.
10-2-611.   When consolidation effective -- Disincorporation of original municipalities -- Effective date for assessment purposes.

(1)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of consolidation under Section 67-1a-6.5: 

(a)  the consolidation is effective; and

(b)  the original municipalities involved in the consolidation are disincorporated.

(2) (a)  The effective date of a consolidation of municipalities for purposes of assessing property within the consolidated municipality is governed by Section 59-2-305.5.

(b)  Until the documents listed in Subsection 10-2-610(3)(b) are recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which the property is located, a consolidated municipality may not:

(i)  levy or collect a property tax on property within the consolidated municipality;

(ii)  levy or collect an assessment on property within the consolidated municipality; or

(iii)  charge or collect a fee for service provided to property within the consolidated municipality.



Amended by Chapter 350, 2009 General Session

